California, session 20252026, AB759.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 5500.2 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:5500.2. (a) A person may apply to the board and obtain authorization to use the title “architect-in-training” once they have been identified as a candidate for licensure by the board and both of the following requirements are met:(1) The applicant successfully passed at least one division of the examination described in Section 5550.(2) The applicant submits to the board the name and license number of the licensed architect who will be responsible for supervising the applicant while using the title “architect-in-training”.(b) (1) Before the board approves an authorization for an applicant to use the title “architect-in-training,” the licensed architect who will be responsible for supervising the applicant while using the title shall submit to the board a form, as determined by the board, agreeing to be responsible for the work to be performed by the applicant while using the title.(2) (A) If a licensed architect responsible for supervising a person while using the title “architect-in-training” changes, the person using the title shall, within 30 days of the change, notify the board of the change and the name and license number of the subsequent licensed architect who will be responsible for supervising the person while using the title.(B) (i) Notwithstanding Section 5587, a person using the title “architect-in-training” may, during any period in which the person is not under supervision of a licensed architect, request the board to place their authorization to use the title on inactive status.(ii) The board may reactivate an authorization made inactive pursuant to clause (i) upon receipt of the name and license number of the subsequent licensed architect who will be responsible for supervising the applicant while using the title. The board shall not require a person seeking reactivation to reapply or pay an additional fee for those purposes.(c) An abbreviation or derivative of the title “architect-in-training,” other than “AIT,” shall not be used.(d) A person shall not use the title “architect-in-training” to independently offer or provide architectural services to the public.(e) Notwithstanding any other law, the board may disclose a person’s authorization to use the title “architect-in-training” to a member of the public upon request.(f) The use of the title “architect-in-training” in violation of this section may constitute unprofessional conduct and subject the user of the title to administrative action, including, but not limited to, citation, discipline, including any disciplinary action pursuant to Section 5587 or any regulation adopted by the board related to this section or Section 5587, and denial of a license.(g) The board may charge a fee, not to exceed the reasonable cost to the board, to evaluate whether a candidate meets the requirements to use the title “architect-in-training.”(h) (1) A person may use the title “architect-in-training” for no more than four years after approval by the board.(2) A person may apply to the board and obtain authorization to use the title “architect-in-training” a second time if the person has passed a division of the exam described in Section 5500 in the four years immediately preceding the person’s application.(i) A person shall not apply to the board to obtain authorization to use the title “architect-in-training” on or after January 1, 2033.(j) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2027.(k) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2037, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 2. Section 5587 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:5587. (a) The board may, upon its own initiative or upon the receipt of a complaint, investigate the actions of any person using the title “architect-in-training” pursuant to Section 5500.2, and make findings for those purposes.(b) The board may suspend or revoke an active authorization to use the title “architect-in-training” approved pursuant to Section 5500.2 for any of the following reasons:(1) There is no longer a licensed architect responsible for supervising the person using the title “architect-in-training,” regardless of who ended the supervisory arrangement.(2) The person using the title “architect-in-training” committed any act of fraud, deceit, or misrepresentation in obtaining the authorization to use that title.(3) The person using the title “architect-in-training” violated any provision of this chapter or any regulation adopted by the board related to this chapter, or aids or abets any person in the violation of this chapter or those regulations.(c) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2027.(d) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2037, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 3. Section 5587.5 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:5587.5. (a) A licensed architect who is responsible for supervising a person using the title “architect-in-training” pursuant to Section 5500.2 shall be subject to disciplinary actions for any violations of this chapter committed by the person using that title within the course and scope of their employment.(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2027.(c) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2037, and as of that date is repealed.